Washington statutes.
RCW 43.380.050

Council powers and duties—Selection of executive director—Stakeholder participation—Reports.

(1) In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this chapter, the council is empowered to:

(a) Meet at such times and places as necessary;

(b) Advise the legislature and the governor on issues relating to reentry and reintegration of offenders;

(c) Review, study, and make policy and funding recommendations on issues directly and indirectly related to reentry and reintegration of offenders in Washington state, including, but not limited to: Correctional programming and other issues in state and local correctional facilities; housing; employment; education; treatment; and other issues contributing to recidivism;

(d) Apply for, receive, use, and leverage public and private grants as well as specifically appropriated funds to establish, manage, and promote initiatives and programs related to successful reentry and reintegration of offenders;

(e) Contract for services as it deems necessary in order to carry out initiatives and programs;

(f) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly administration of initiatives and programs;

(g) Create committees and subcommittees of the council as is necessary for the council to conduct its business; and

(h) Create and consult with advisory groups comprising nonmembers. Advisory groups are not eligible for reimbursement under RCW 43.380.060.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the council may select an executive director to administer the business of the council.

(a) The council may delegate to the executive director by resolution all duties necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the council. Approval by a majority vote of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the executive director.

(b) The executive director may not be a member of the council while serving as executive director.

(c) Employment of the executive director must be confirmed by the senate and terminates after a term of three years. At the end of a term, the council may consider hiring the executive director for an additional three-year term or an extension of a specified period less than three years. The council may fix the compensation of the executive director.

(d) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the executive director shall reside in and be funded by the department.

(3) In conducting its business, the council shall solicit input and participation from stakeholders interested in reducing recidivism, promoting public safety, and improving community conditions for people reentering the community from incarceration. The council shall consult: The two largest caucuses in the house of representatives; the two largest caucuses in the senate; the governor; local governments; educators; behavioral health providers; behavioral health administrative services organizations; managed care organizations; city and county jails; the department of corrections; specialty courts; persons with expertise in evidence-based and research-based reentry practices; and persons with criminal histories and their families.

(4) The council shall submit to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature a preliminary report of its activities and recommendations by December 1st of its first year of operation, and every two years thereafter.

[ 2019 c 325 s 5016; 2016 c 188 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 325: See note following RCW 71.24.011.